cs: Obsah balení saxofonu: Čisticí sada; Pouzdro; Vytěrák; Mazadlo na korek; Měkké pouzdro; Ligatura; Hubička; Klobouček na hubičku; Popruh na krk; Lešticí hadřík; Plátek; Stojan; Opěrka palce; Jiné
ja: サックスパッケージ内容: ケアキット; ケース; クリーニングスワブ; コルクグリス; ギグバッグ; リガチャー; マウスピース; マウスピースキャップ; ネックストラップ; ポリシングクロス; リード; スタンド; サムレスト; その他
hr-HR: Sadržaj paketa saksofona: Komplet za njegu; Kovčeg; Bris za čišćenje; Mast za pluto; Torba (gig bag); Ligatura; Usnik; Poklopac usnika; Remen za vrat; Krpa za poliranje; Trska; Stalak; Oslonac/korektor za palac; Ostalo
nl: Saxofoon pakketinhoud: Onderhoudskit; Koffer; Wisdoek; Kurkvet; Gigbag; Rietbinder; Mondstuk; Mondstukdop; Nekband; Poetsdoek; Riet; Standaard; Duimsteun; Overige
ko: 색소폰 패키지 구성품: 관리 키트; 케이스; 클리닝 스왑; 코르크 그리스; 긱 백; 리가처; 마우스피스; 마우스피스 캡; 넥 스트랩; 폴리싱 클로스; 리드; 스탠드; 엄지 받침대; 기타
fi: Saksofonipaketin sisältö: Hoitopakkaus; Kotelo; Läpiveto; Korkkirasva; Keikkakassi; Kiristin; Suukappale; Suukappaleen suojus; Kaulahihna; Kiillotusliina; Lehdykkä; Teline; Peukalotuki; Muu
sk-SK: Obsah balenia saxofónu: Súprava na starostlivosť; Puzdro; Vytierak; Mazivo na korok; Prepravný obal; Ligatúra; Hubica; Klobúčik na hubicu; Remeň na krk; Leštiaca handrička; Plátok; Stojan; Opierka palca; Iné
es: Contenido del paquete del saxofón: Kit de mantenimiento; Estuche; Escobillón de limpieza; Grasa para corcho; Funda de transporte; Abrazadera; Boquilla; Tapa para boquilla; Correa para el cuello; Paño de pulido; Caña; Soporte; Apoyo para el pulgar; Otro
bg-BG: Съдържание на комплекта за саксофон: Комплект за поддръжка; Калъф; Протривалка; Смазка за корк; Мек калъф; Лигатура; Мундщук; Капачка за мундщук; Ремък за врат; Кърпа за полиране; Платък; Стойка; Опора за палец; Друго
nb: Saksofon-pakkeinnhold: Vedlikeholdssett; Etui; Renseklut; Korkfett; Gigbag; Rørklemme; Munnstykke; Munnstykkehette; Nakkereim; Pusseklut; Flis; Stativ; Tommelstøtte; Annet
sl-SI: Vsebina paketa saksofona: Komplet za nego; Kovček; Brisalo za čiščenje; Mast za pluto; Torba (Gig bag); Objemka (Ligatura); Ustnik; Pokrovček za ustnik; Ovratni pas; Krpa za poliranje; Jeziček; Stojalo; Naslon za palec; Drugo
pt-PT: Conteúdo da embalagem do saxofone: Kit de manutenção; Estojo; Escovilhão de limpeza; Massa para cortiça; Saco de transporte; Abraçadeira; Boquilha; Tampa da boquilha; Correia de pescoço; Pano de polimento; Palheta; Suporte; Descanso de polegar; Outro
da: Indhold af saxofonpakken: Plejesæt; Etui; Rensesnor; Korkfedt; Gigbag; Ligatur; Mundstykke; Mundstykkehætte; Halsrem; Pudseklud; Rørblad; Stativ; Tommelstøtte; Andet
ro-RO: Conținutul pachetului de saxofon: Kit de îngrijire; Cutie; Tampon de curățare; Unsoare pentru plută; Husă de transport; Brățară; Muștiuc; Capac pentru muștiuc; Cordon pentru gât; Lavetă pentru lustruire; Ancie; Suport; Suport pentru degetul mare; Altele
de: Inhalt des Saxophonpakets: Pflege-Set; Etui; Reinigungswischer; Korkfett; Gigbag; Blattschraube; Mundstück; Mundstückkapsel; Nackengurt; Poliertuch; Rohrblatt; Ständer; Daumenstütze; Sonstige
it: Contenuto della confezione del sassofono: Kit per la manutenzione; Custodia; Scovolino; Grasso per sughero; Borsa morbida; Legatura; Bocchino; Copribocchino; Tracolla; Panno per lucidare; Ancia; Supporto; Poggiadito; Altro
pl: Zawartość pakietu saksofonu: Zestaw do pielęgnacji; Futerał; Wycior; Smar do korka; Pokrowiec (gig bag); Ligaturka; Ustnik; Kapturek na ustnik; Pasek na szyję; Ściereczka do polerowania; Stroik; Statyw; Podpórka pod kciuk; Inne
zh-TW: 薩克斯風包裝內容: 保養套組; 樂器盒; 清潔通條布; 軟木膏; 琴袋; 束圈; 吹嘴; 吹嘴蓋; 頸帶; 拋光布; 簧片; 支架; 拇指靠座; 其他
zh-CN: 萨克斯管包装内容物: 护理套装; 琴盒; 清洁通条布; 软木膏; 琴包; 哨箍; 笛头; 笛头帽; 挂脖带; 抛光布; 哨片; 琴架; 拇指托; 其他
tr: Saksafon paketi içeriği: Bakım kiti; Çanta; Temizleme bezi; Mantar yağı; Gig bag (taşıma çantası); Bek bileziği; Bek; Bek kapağı; Boyun askısı; Cilalama bezi; Kamış; Stand; Başparmak dayanağı; Diğer
vi: Nội dung gói sản phẩm kèn saxophone: Bộ dụng cụ chăm sóc; Hộp đựng; Vải lau nòng; Mỡ bôi trơn nút bần; Túi mềm; Đai buộc dăm kèn; Búp kèn; Nắp đậy búp kèn; Dây đeo cổ; Khăn đánh bóng; Dăm kèn; Chân đế; Điểm tựa ngón cái; Khác
fr: Contenu de l’ensemble de saxophone: Kit d’entretien; Étui; Écouvillon de nettoyage; Graisse à liège; Housse de transport; Ligature; Bec; Couvre-bec; Cordon; Chiffon à lustrer; Anche; Support; Repose-pouce; Autre
el: Περιεχόμενα συσκευασίας σαξοφώνου: Κιτ περιποίησης; Θήκη; Πανί καθαρισμού (swab); Γράσο φελλού; Τσάντα μεταφοράς (Gig bag); Σφιγκτήρας; Επιστόμιο; Καπάκι επιστομίου; Λουράκι λαιμού; Πανάκι γυαλίσματος; Καλάμι; Βάση; Στήριγμα αντίχειρα; Άλλο
pt-BR: Saxofone conteúdo da embalagem: kit de cuidados; Estojo; Esfregão de limpeza; Graxa para cortiça; Gig bag; Abraçadeira; Boquilha; Cobre-boquilha; Correia de pescoço; Pano de polimento; Palheta; Suporte; Apoio de polegar; Outros
ru: Содержимое комплекта саксофона: Набор для ухода; Футляр; Протирка; Смазка для пробки; Мягкий чехол; Лигатура; Мундштук; Колпачок для мундштука; Шейный ремень; Салфетка для полировки; Трость; Стойка; Упор для большого пальца; Другое
th: รายการอุปกรณ์ในกล่องแซ็กโซโฟน: ชุดดูแลรักษา; เคส; ผ้าเช็ดทำความสะอาดท่อ; คอร์กจาระบี; กิกแบ็ก; รัดลิ้น; เมาส์พีซ; ฝาครอบเมาส์พีซ; สายคล้องคอ; ผ้าขัดเงา; ลิ้น; ขาตั้ง; ที่พักนิ้วโป้ง; อื่นๆ
sv: Saxofonpaket – Innehåll: Skötselkit; Fodral; Läskduk; Korkfett; Gigbag; Ligatur; Munstycke; Munstyckskapsel; Nackrem; Putsduk; Rörblad; Stativ; Tumstöd; Övrigt
en: Saxophone package contents: Care kit; Case; Cleaning swab; Cork grease; Gig bag; Ligature; Mouthpiece; Mouthpiece cap; Neck strap; Polishing cloth; Reed; Stand; Thumb rest; Other
hu: Szaxofoncsomag tartalma: Ápolókészlet; Tok; Áthúzó tisztító; Parafazsír; Puhatok; Szorító; Fúvóka; Fúvókavédő kupak; Nyakpánt; Törlőkendő; Nád; Állvány; Hüvelykujjtámasz; Egyéb
lt-LT: Saksofono pakuotės turinys: Priežiūros rinkinys; Dėklas; Valymo šluostė su virvele; Kamščių tepalas; Minkštas dėklas; Ligatūra; Kandiklis; Kandiklio gaubtelis; Kaklo dirželis; Poliravimo šluostė; Liežuvėlis; Stovas; Nykščio atrama; Kita